Hawaii, session 2025, HB856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that permanent agricultural technician positions and community coordinator positions within the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resources are needed to successfully implement the college of tropical agriculture and human resources' mission through its agricultural research and extension stations initiatives.  These initiatives: (1)  Serve as hubs for area and region-specific agricultural research, education, and community engagement; and (2)  Support local farmers and ranchers, and offer educational programs for all ages, from keiki to adults. The legislature further finds that although the college of tropical agriculture and human resources provides crucial support for local farmers, ranchers, and communities, their research and extension operations are hampered by a lack of permanent agricultural technician positions. These technicians are essential for the establishment and maintenance of experimental and demonstration plant and animal trials, as well as the upkeep of station facilities and equipment.  Community coordinator positions connect college of tropical agriculture and human resources to the communities with education and farming opportunities for local families and keiki. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and fund eight full-time (8.0 FTE) agricultural technicians and four full-time (4.0 FTE) community coordinator positions to provide support to the college's research and extension stations, local community resilience, and the State's highly valued agricultural industries that are challenged with economically damaging pests, disease, climate and production issues, agricultural and natural resources educational outreach, and agriculture workforce development. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,250,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the college of tropical agriculture and human resources at the university of Hawaii at Manoa to establish eight full-time equivalent (8.0 FTE) agricultural technician positions and four-full time equivalent (4.0 FTE) community coordinator positions. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________